Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.550

Alcohol use disorder decision-making tool.

The addictions, drug, and alcohol institute at the University of Washington shall create a patient shared decision-making tool to assist behavioral health and medical providers when discussing medication treatment options for patients with alcohol use disorder. The institute shall distribute the tool to behavioral health and medical providers and instruct them on ways to incorporate the use of the tool into their practices. The institute shall conduct regular evaluations of the tool and update the tool as necessary.

[ 2024 c 366 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 366: See note following RCW 71.24.847.